Illinois, session 104th, SB3258.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Section 143.35 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/143.35 new)7    Sec. 143.35. Optional rental vehicle coverage. 8    (a) In response to all applications for a policy of 9automobile insurance, as defined in paragraph (a) of Section 10143.13, received by an insurance company, the insurance 11company shall provide the applicant written notice regarding 12the availability of rental vehicle coverage for an insured 13vehicle as a result of a cause of loss covered by the policy 14contract, including the coverage limits and costs thereof.15    (b) At least 30 days prior to each renewal of a policy of 16automobile insurance, as defined in paragraph (a) of Section 17143.13, the insurance company shall provide the insured 18written notice regarding the availability of rental vehicle 19coverage for an insured vehicle as a result of a cause of loss 20covered by the policy contract, including the coverage limits 21and costs thereof. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect on July   SB3258 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17101 BAB 30520 b11, 2027.